Maryland, session 2025, SB0036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
1–308.
(a) There is a 9–1–1 Trust Fund.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and subject to §
1–309.1 of this subtitle, the purposes of the 9–1–1 Trust Fund are to:
(i) reimburse counties for the cost of enhancing a 9–1–1 system;
(ii) pay contractors in accordance with § 1–306(b)(12) of this subtitle;
and
(iii) fund the coordinator position and staff to handle the increased
duties related to wireless enhanced 9–1–1 service under § 1–305 of this subtitle, as an
administrative cost.
– 1 –

Ch. 14 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, in addition to the purposes
described under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the purposes of the 9–1–1 Trust Fund
include funding:
(i) the operation and maintenance of 9–1–1 systems, enhanced
9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1 services, including:
1. equipment and software utilized directly for providing
9–1–1 services by a public safety answering point;
2. protocol systems and software utilized directly for
providing 9–1–1 services by a public safety answering point;
3. interpretation services provided for a public safety
answering point;
4. services provided for a public safety answering point to
ensure improved access to individuals with disabilities and other individuals who use
assistive technology; and
5. voice, data, and call log recorders utilized to capture
information from 9–1–1 systems, enhanced 9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1
services;
(ii) the operation and maintenance of 9–1–1 systems, enhanced
9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1 services connectivity and infrastructure
equipment, including:
1. automatic number and location identification; and
2. Primary Rate Interface and Session Initiation Protocol
trucking for 10–digit emergency and nonemergency lines;
(iii) geographical information systems hardware, software, data
development, and data management costs incurred for the effective operation of 9–1–1
systems, enhanced 9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1 services, including:
1. mapping equipment;
2. interfaces to computer–aided dispatch; and
3. geographical information systems base layer development
and management;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 14
(iv) public safety answering point facilities costs, including access
control, security systems, and standby power;
(v) costs for public education materials;
(vi) the training of county personnel working in or directly
supporting a public safety answering point;
(vii) the provision of tuition reimbursement for 9–1–1 specialists for
educational programs related to the 9–1–1 specialist career field;
(viii) costs to maintain the cybersecurity of 9–1–1 systems, enhanced
9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1 services;
(ix) costs of 9–1–1 specialist recruitment activities as described in §
1–306(b)(17) of this subtitle; [and]
(x) costs of telecommunications cardiopulmonary resuscitation
training; AND
(XI) COSTS RELATED TO THE OPERATION OF THE 9–8–8 SUICIDE
PREVENTION HOTLINE THAT MAY BE SHARED WITH 9–1–1 ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING
SOFTWARE INTERFACES AND JOINT TRAINING.
(3) Funding allocated in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection
may not be utilized for any [purpose associated with] COSTS THAT SOLELY SUPPORT the
9–8–8 suicide prevention hotline.
1–309.
(a) On recommendation of the Board, each year the Secretary shall request an
appropriation from the 9–1–1 Trust Fund in an amount sufficient to:
(1) carry out the purposes of this subtitle;
(2) pay the administrative costs chargeable to the 9–1–1 Trust Fund; and
(3) reimburse counties for the cost of enhancing a 9–1–1 system.
(c) (1) Money accruing to the 9–1–1 Trust Fund may be used as provided in
this subsection.
(6) Money accruing to the 9–1–1 Trust Fund may not be used for:
(i) the maintenance or operation of communications centers other
than public safety answering points; or
– 3 –

Ch. 14 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) any [purpose associated with] COSTS THAT SOLELY SUPPORT
the 9–8–8 suicide prevention hotline.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 4 –